Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 36 Motor Fuel Tax
31-36-20.
Disposition of proceeds.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, all moneys paid into the general treasury under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 37 of this title, and title 46 shall be applied to and held in a separate fund and be deposited in any depositories that may be selected by the general treasurer to the credit of the fund, which fund shall be known as the Intermodal Surface Transportation Fund; provided, that in fiscal year 2004 for the months of July through April six and eighty-five hundredth cents ($0.0685) per gallon of the tax imposed and accruing for the liability under the provisions of §

31-36-7

, less refunds and credits, shall be transferred to the Rhode Island public transit authority as provided under §

39-18-21

. For the months of May and June in fiscal year 2004, the allocation shall be five and five hundredth cents ($0.0505). Thereafter, until fiscal year 2006, the allocation shall be six and twenty-five hundredth cents ($0.0625). For fiscal years 2006 through FY 2008, the allocation shall be seven and twenty-five hundredth cents ($0.0725); provided, that expenditures shall include the costs of a market survey of non-transit users and a management study of the agency to include the feasibility of moving the Authority into the Department of Transportation, both to be conducted under the auspices of the state budget officer. The state budget officer shall hire necessary consultants to perform the studies, and shall direct payment by the Authority. Both studies shall be transmitted by the Budget Officer to the 2006 session of the General Assembly, with comments from the Authority. For fiscal year 2009, the allocation shall be seven and seventy-five hundredth cents ($0.0775), of which one-half cent ($0.005) shall be derived from the one cent ($0.01) per gallon environmental protection fee pursuant to §

46-12.9-11

. For fiscal years 2010 and thereafter, the allocation shall be nine and seventy-five hundredth cents ($0.0975), of which of one-half cent ($0.005) shall be derived from the one cent ($0.01) per gallon environmental protection fee pursuant to §

46-12.9-11

. One cent ($0.01) per gallon shall be transferred to the Elderly/Disabled Transportation Program of the department of human services, and the remaining cents per gallon shall be available for general revenue as determined by the following schedule:

For the fiscal year 2000, three and one-fourth cents ($0.0325) shall be available for general revenue.

For the fiscal year 2001, one and three-fourth cents ($0.0175) shall be available for general revenue.

For the fiscal year 2002, one-fourth cent ($0.0025) shall be available for general revenue.

For the fiscal year 2003, two and one-fourth cent ($0.0225) shall be available for general revenue.

For the months of July through April in fiscal year 2004, one and four-tenths cents ($0.014) shall be available for general revenue. For the months of May through June in fiscal year 2004, three and two-tenths cents ($0.032) shall be available for general revenue, and thereafter, until fiscal year 2006, two cents ($0.02) shall be available for general revenue. For fiscal year 2006 through fiscal year 2009 one cent ($0.01) shall be available for general revenue.

(2)

All deposits and transfers of funds made by the tax administrator under this section, including those to the Rhode Island public transit authority, the department of human services, the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority, and the general fund, shall be made within twenty-four (24) hours of receipt or previous deposit of the funds in question.

(3)

Commencing in fiscal year 2004, the Director of the Rhode Island Department of Transportation is authorized to remit, on a monthly or less frequent basis as shall be determined by the Director of the Rhode Island Department of Transportation, or his or her designee, or at the election of the Director of the Rhode Island Department of Transportation, with the approval of the Director of the Department of Administration, to an indenture trustee, administrator, or other third party fiduciary, in an amount not to exceed two cents ($0.02) per gallon of the gas tax imposed, in order to satisfy debt service payments on aggregate bonds issued pursuant to a Joint Resolution and Enactment Approving the Financing of Various Department of Transportation Projects adopted during the 2003 session of the General Assembly, and approved by the Governor.

(4)

Commencing in fiscal year 2015, three and one-half cents ($0.035) shall be transferred to the Rhode Island Turnpike and Bridge Authority to be used for maintenance, operations, capital expenditures and debt service on any of its projects as defined in chapter 12 of title 24 in lieu of a toll on the Sakonnet River Bridge. The Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority is authorized to remit to an indenture trustee, administrator, or other third-party fiduciary any or all of the foregoing transfers in order to satisfy and/or secure its revenue bonds and notes and/or debt service payments thereon, including, but not limited to, the bonds and notes issued pursuant to the Joint Resolution set forth in Section 3 of Article 6 of Chapter 23 of the Public Laws of 2010. Notwithstanding any other provision of said Joint Resolution, the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority is expressly authorized to issue bonds and notes previously authorized under said Joint Resolution for the purpose of financing all expenses incurred by it for the formerly authorized tolling of the Sakonnet River Bridge and the termination thereof.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, all other funds in the fund shall be dedicated to the department of transportation, subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly. The director of transportation shall submit to the general assembly, budget office and office of the governor annually an accounting of all amounts deposited in and credited to the fund together with a budget for proposed expenditures for the succeeding fiscal year in compliance with §§

35-3-1

and

35-3-4

. On order of the director of transportation, the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payments of any sum or portion of the sum that may be required from time to time upon receipt of properly authenticated vouchers.

At any time the amount of the fund is insufficient to fund the expenditures of the department of transportation, not to exceed the amount authorized by the general assembly, the general treasurer is authorized, with the approval of the governor and the director of administration, in anticipation of the receipts of monies enumerated in this section to advance sums to the fund, for the purposes specified in this section, any funds of the state not specifically held for any particular purpose. However, all the advances made to the fund shall be returned to the general fund immediately upon the receipt by the fund of proceeds resulting from the receipt of monies to the extent of the advances.

History of Section.

P.L. 1942, ch. 1212, art. 13, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-36-20

; P.L. 1983, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 2, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 35, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 45, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 30, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 6, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 31, art. 12, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 434, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 436, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 24, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 42; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 29, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 28, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 36, § 9; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 18, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 16, § 5; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 9, § 11; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 5, § 9 and art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 21, § 4.

31-36-20.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 35, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 6, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

31-36-21.
Deposit in mail as sufficient notice.

In the administration of this chapter and chapter 37 of this title, the requirement that the tax administrator give notice by mail shall be fulfilled by the depositing in any United States post office of the notice, either as ordinary, registered, or certified mail, directed to the latest address of the person concerned which shall have been filed with the tax administrator. It shall be the responsibility of each person liable for any tax under these chapters to keep the tax administrator informed of his or her correct address.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 181, § 9.

31-36-22.
Rules and regulations — Forms.

The tax administrator shall prescribe rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, to carry into effect the provisions of this chapter and chapter 37 of this title. These rules and regulations, when reasonably designed to carry out the intent and purpose of these chapters, shall be prima facie evidence of their proper interpretation. The rules and regulations may from time to time be amended, suspended, or revoked, in whole or in part, by the tax administrator.

The tax administrator shall prescribe, and shall furnish, any forms necessary or proper for the administration of these chapters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 181, § 9; P.L. 2009, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 168, § 1.

31-36-23.
Severability.

The provisions of this chapter and chapter 37 of this title are declared to be severable. In case any part, section, or provision of these chapters is held void by any court of competent jurisdiction, the remaining parts, sections, and provisions of the chapter shall not be impaired or otherwise affected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 181, § 9.